Arkansas, session 2025, HB1153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - BEEF COUNCIL. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the Beef Council Fund,
for operating, research and development expenses of the Department of
Agriculture - Arkansas Beef Council for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $22,076
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,000
(C) PROF. FEES 3,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
*BSS003*
01/14/2025 3:13:10 PM BSS003

HB1153
(02) RESEARCH & DEVELOPMENT 1,037,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,067,076

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - CATFISH PROMOTION BOARD. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
Arkansas Catfish Promotion Fund, for operating expenses, research, promotion
and consumer activities of the Department of Agriculture - Arkansas Catfish
Promotion Board for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $1,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 25,000
(03) RESEARCH DEVELOPMENT 94,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $120,000

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - CORN AND GRAIN SORGHUM PROMOTION BOARD.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
from the Arkansas Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion Board Fund, for operating,
research and development expenses of the Department of Agriculture - Arkansas
Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion Board for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $25,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
01/14/2025 3:13:10 PM BSS003

HB1153
(02) RESEARCH/DEVELOPMENT 1,975,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,000,000

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - RICE RESEARCH AND PROMOTION BOARD. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Fund, for operating, research and
development expenses of the Department of Agriculture - Arkansas Rice
Research and Promotion Board for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $14,200
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) RESEARCH/DEVELOPMENT 6,966,496
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $6,980,696

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - RICE RESEARCH AND PROMOTION BOARD - CASH.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable
from the cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for rice research
and development of the Department of Agriculture - Arkansas Rice Research and
Promotion Board for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) RESEARCH & DEVELOPMENT $15,000,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - SOYBEAN PROMOTION BOARD. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
Soybean Promotion Fund, for operating, research and development expenses of
the Department of Agriculture - Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
01/14/2025 3:13:10 PM BSS003

HB1153

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $60,500
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 2,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) RESEARCH/DEVELOPMENT 8,537,500
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $8,600,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - WHEAT PROMOTION BOARD. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the
Arkansas Wheat Promotion Fund, for operating, research and development
expenses of the Department of Agriculture - Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $3,599
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) RESEARCH/DEVELOPMENT 440,895
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $444,494

SECTION 8. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
01/14/2025 3:13:10 PM BSS003

HB1153
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 9. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 10. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.













01/14/2025 3:13:10 PM BSS003